Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5765.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-10-9.8 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10 entitled "Retirement
System — Contributions and Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-10-9.8. Retirement on service allowance — State law enforcement professionals.
(a) Effective January 1, 2025 2026, notwithstanding any special law or general law, rule,
or regulation to the contrary, state employees employed as deputy sheriffs, capitol police officers,
environmental police officers, juvenile program workers, shift coordinators, probation and parole
officers, firefighters, crew chiefs, assistant chiefs, fire investigators, fire safety inspectors, fire
safety training officers, explosives and flammable liquids technicians, and campus police officers
employed by the state of Rhode Island shall be entitled to the benefits provided by §§ 45-21.2-5,
45-21.2-6, 45-21.2-10, 45-21.2-11, 45-21.2-12, and 45-21.2-13.
(b) For members identified in subsection (a) of this section, service credits earned prior to
January 1, 2025, shall be determined by the laws in effect on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001610
========